Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.670

Costs of implementing RCW 15.65.287.

The costs incurred by the department associated with the implementation of RCW 15.65.287 shall be paid for by the affected commodity commissions.

[ 2003 c 396 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.